Mississippi, session 2026, HB64.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the governing authorities of the City of Greenville, Mississippi, to assist in paying costs associated with transportation infrastructure needs and sanitary sewer/water system infrastructure needs, as provided in Section 2, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027................. $ 150,810,510.00. SECTION 2.  The money appropriated by Section 1 shall be used for the following purposes: (a)  Transportation infrastructure:  Making upgrades and improvements to the Greenville Downtown Corridor consisting of Washington Avenue, Poplar Street and Walnut Street......................... ................................................ $ 4,500,000.00. (b)  Sanitary sewer/water system infrastructure: Rehabilitating the sanitary sewer system to fully comply with the partial consent decree requirements, and making upgrades and improvements to the water system regarding the distribution system, production system, metering and billing system and fire protection. $ 146,310,510.00. TOTAL......................................... $ 150,810,510.00. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.